Utah statutes.
16-16-115.   Business transactions of member with limited cooperative association.

Subject to Sections 16-16-818 and 16-16-819 and except as otherwise provided in the organic rules or a specific contract relating to a transaction, a member may lend money to and transact other business with a limited cooperative association in the same manner as a person that is not a member.

